GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-professions.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     profession names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http://publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Adj +NAdj

+Title
+Prof


+Sg +Pl
+Masc +Fem

+Abbr

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space


!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;
LEXICON MFSG	MSG; FSG;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

LEXICON ROOT 
ammiraglio+Title+Abbr:amm.		MSG;
ammiraglio+Title			MSG;
appuntato+Title+Abbr:app.		MSG;
appuntato+Title				MSG;
architetto+Title+Abbr:arch.		MFSG;
architetto+Title			MFSG;
avvocato+Title+Abbr:avv.		MFSG;
avvocato+Title				MFSG;
capitano+Title+Abbr:cap.		MSG;
capitano+Title				MSG;
capitan+Title				MSG;
caporale+Title				MSG;
cardinale+Title:cardinal		MSG;
cardinale+Title:card.			MSG;
cardinale+Title				MSG;
cavalier+Title+Abbr:cav.		MSG;
cavalier+Title				MSG;
colonnello+Title+Abbr:col.		MSG;
colonnello+Title			MSG;
commendator+Title+Abbr:comm.		MSG;
commendator+Title			MSG;
ct+Title+Abbr				MSG;
direttore+Title+Abbr:dir.		MSG;
direttore+Title				MSG;
direttrice+Title+Abbr:dir.		FSG;
direttrice+Title			FSG;
donna+Title:donna			FSG;
don+Title:don				MSG;
dottoressa+Title+Abbr:dott.ssa		FSG;
dottoressa+Title			FSG;
dottor+Title+Abbr:dott.			MSG;
dottor+Title+Abbr:dr.			MSG;
dottor+Title				MSG;
generale+Title+Abbr:gen.		MSG;
generale+Title				MSG;
geometra+Title+Abbr:geom.		MFSG;
geometra+Title				MFSG;
GIP+Title+Abbr				MSG;
ingegner+Title+Abbr:ing.		MFSG;
ingegner+Title				MFSG;
junior+Title+Abbr:jr.			MSG;
junior+Title				MSG;
maggiore+Title+Abbr:magg.		MSG;
maggiore+Title				MSG;
maresciallo+Title+Abbr:mar.		MSG;
maresciallo+Title			MSG;
mister+Title+Abbr:mr.			MSG;
mister+Title:mister			MSG;
monsignor+Title+Abbr:mons.		MSG;
monsignor+Title:monsignor		MSG;
nobil% donna+Title+Abbr:N.D.		FSG;
nobil% uomo+Title+Abbr:N.H.		MSG;
onorevole+Title+Abbr:on.		MFSG;
onorevole+Title				MFSG;
padre+Title+Abbr:p.			MSG;
padre+Title:padre			MSG;
perito% industriale+Title+Abbr:p.i.	MSG;
perito% industriale+Title		MSG;
Pm+Title+Abbr				MSG;
PM+Title+Abbr				MSG;
presidentessa+Title+Abbr:pres.		FSG;
presidentessa+Title			FSG;
presidente+Title+Abbr:pres.		MFSG;
presidente+Title			MFSG;
professoressa+Title+Abbr:prof.		FSG;
professoressa+Title+Abbr:prof.ssa	FSG;
professoressa+Title+Abbr:prof.sse	FPL;
professoressa+Title			FSG;
professoressa+Title:professoresse	FPL;
professore+Title+Masc+Pl+Abbr:proff.	MPL;
professor+Title+Abbr:prof.		MSG;
professor+Title:professor		MSG;
professor+Title:professori		MPL;
ragioniera+Title+Abbr:rag.		FSG;
ragioniera+Title			FSG;
ragionier+Title+Abbr:rag.		MSG;
ragionier+Title				MSG;
sacerdote+Title+Abbr:sac.		MSG;
sacerdote+Title				MSG;
segretaria+Title+Abbr:segr.		FSG;
segretaria+Title			FSG;
segretario+Title+Abbr:segr.		MSG;
segretario+Title			MSG;
senatore% a% vita+Title			MSG;
senatore+Title+Abbr:sen.		MSG;
senatore+Title				MSG;
senatrice+Title+Abbr:sen.		FSG;
senatrice+Title				FSG;
senior+Title+Abbr:sr.			MSG;
senior+Title				MSG;
sergente+Title+Abbr:serg.		MSG;
sergente+Title				MSG;
signora+Title+Abbr:sig.ra		FSG;
signora+Title				FSG;
signorina+Title+Abbr:sig.na		FSG;
signorina+Title				FSG;
signor+Title+Abbr:sig.			MSG;
signor+Title				MSG;
sir+Title				MSG;
sottotenente+Title+Abbr:sottoten.	MSG;
sottotenente+Title+Abbr:s.ten.		MSG;
sottotenente+Title			MSG;
Sua% Eminenza+Title+Abbr:S.E.		MSG;
Sua% Eminenza+Title			MSG;
Sua% Santità+Title+Abbr:S.S.		MSG;
Sua% Santità+Title			MSG;
tenente% di% vascello+Title+Abbr:T.V.	MSG;
tenente% di% vascello+Title		MSG;
tenente+Title+Abbr:ten.			MSG;
tenente+Title				MSG;
ufficiale+Title+Abbr:uff.		MSG;
vescovo+Title+Abbr:vesc.		MSG;
vescovo+Title				MSG;
vicepresidente+Title+Abbr:vicepres.	MFSG;
vicepresidente+Title			MFSG;
anarchico+Prof		MFSGPL;
antifascista+Prof		MFSGPL;
calvinista+Prof		MFSGPL;
cattolico+Prof		MFSGPL;
comunista+Prof		MFSGPL;
centrista+Prof		MFSGPL;
sciita+Prof		MFSGPL;
cristiano+Prof		MFSGPL;
democratico+Prof		MFSGPL;
democratico-cristiano+Prof		MFSGPL;
cristiano-democratico+Prof		MFSGPL;
evangelista+Prof		MFSGPL;
estremista+Prof		MFSGPL;
indipendentista+Prof	MFSGPL;
integralista+Prof		MFSGPL;
islamista+Prof		MFSGPL;
islamico+Prof		MFSGPL;
giudeo+Prof		MFSGPL;
ebreo+Prof			MFSGPL;
luterano+Prof		MFSGPL;
mormone+Prof		MFSGPL;
musulmano+Prof		MFSGPL;
nazionalista+Prof		MFSGPL;
nazional-socialista+Prof	MFSGPL;
nazi+Prof			MFSGPL;
oppositore+Prof		MFSGPL;
ortodosso+Prof		MFSGPL;
populista+Prof		MFSGPL;
protestante+Prof		MFSGPL;
ribelle+Prof		MFSGPL;
repubblicano+Prof		MFSGPL;
rivoluzionario+Prof	MFSGPL;
social-democratico+Prof	MFSGPL;
sunnita+Prof		MFSGPL;
terrorista+Prof		MFSGPL;
lavoratore+Prof		MFSGPL;
capitano+Prof		MFSGPL;
sottotenente+Prof	MFSGPL;
maggiore+Prof		MFSGPL;
caporale+Prof		MFSGPL;
ammiraglio+Prof		MFSGPL;
gendarme+Prof		MFSGPL;
soldato+Prof		MFSGPL;
maresciallo+Prof	MFSGPL;
deputato+Prof		MFSGPL;
sindaco+Prof		MFSGPL;
presidente+Prof		MFSGPL;
vicepresidente+Prof	MFSGPL;
viceministro+Prof		MFSGPL;
consigliere+Prof		MFSGPL;
cancelliere+Prof		MFSGPL;
console+Prof		MFSGPL;
senatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
ambasciatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
militante+Prof		MFSGPL;
dittatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
procuratore+Prof		MFSGPL;
magistrato+Prof		MFSGPL;
segretario+Prof		MFSGPL;
funzionario+Prof	MFSGPL;
imam+Prof			MFSGPL;
sceicco+Prof		MFSGPL;
imperatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
re+Prof			MFSGPL;
regina+Prof		FSGPL;
duca+Prof			MFSGPL;
duchessa+Prof		FSGPL;
principessa+Prof		FSGPL;
conte+Prof			MFSGPL;
contessa+Prof		FSGPL;
marchese+Prof		MSG;
vescovo+Prof		MFSGPL;
prete+Prof			MFSGPL;
pastore+Prof		MFSGPL;
artista+Prof		MFSGPL;
compositore+Prof		MFSGPL;
cantante+Prof		MFSGPL;
soprano+Prof		MFSGPL;
basso+Prof			MFSGPL;
baritono+Prof		MFSGPL;
pianista+Prof		MFSGPL;
organista+Prof		MFSGPL;
violonista+Prof		MFSGPL;
contrabbassista+Prof	MFSGPL;
flautista+Prof		MFSGPL;
arpista+Prof		MFSGPL;
batterista+Prof		MFSGPL;
saxofonista+Prof		MFSGPL;
chitarrista+Prof		MFSGPL;
attore+Prof		MFSGPL;
regista+Prof		MFSGPL;
produttore+Prof		MFSGPL;
romanziere+Prof		MFSGPL;
autrice+Prof		MFSGPL;
scrittrice+Prof		MFSGPL;
illustratore+Prof	MFSGPL;
scultore+Prof		MFSGPL;
ballerino+Prof		MFSGPL;
poeta+Prof		MFSGPL;
pittore+Prof		MFSGPL;
architetto+Prof		MFSGPL;
giocatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
rugbyman+Prof		MFSGPL;
tennista+Prof		MFSGPL;
pattinatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
ciclista+Prof		MFSGPL;
ginnasta+Prof		MFSGPL;
skipper+Prof		MFSGPL;
sostenitore+Prof		MFSGPL;
coatch+Prof		MFSGPL;
navigatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
boxeur+Prof		MFSGPL;
alpinista+Prof		MFSGPL;
negoziante+Prof		MFSGPL;
procuratore+Prof	MFSGPL;
pdg+Prof		MFSGPL;
amministratore% unico+Prof		MFSGPL;
giornalista+Prof		MFSGPL;
reporter+Prof		MFSGPL;
direttore+Prof		MFSGPL;
vicedirettore+Prof	MFSGPL;
businessman+Prof		MFSGPL;
responsabile+Prof		MFSGPL;
medico+Prof		MFSGPL;
pneumologo+Prof		MFSGPL;
dottore+Prof		MFSGPL;
stomatologo+Prof		MFSGPL;
chirurgo+Prof		MFSGPL;
oftalmologo+Prof		MFSGPL;
osteopata+Prof		MFSGPL;
otorinolaringoiatra+Prof	MFSGPL;
scenziato+Prof		MFSGPL;
tecnico+Prof		MFSGPL;
specialista+Prof		MFSGPL;
ricercatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
medievalista+Prof		MFSGPL;
sociologo+Prof		MFSGPL;
geografo+Prof		MFSGPL;
geologo+Prof		MFSGPL;
astronomo+Prof		MFSGPL;
physicien+Prof		MFSGPL;
chimico+Prof		MFSGPL;
matematico+Prof		MFSGPL;
filosofo+Prof		MFSGPL;
astronauta+Prof		MFSGPL;
ragioniere+Prof		MFSGPL;
artigiano+Prof		MFSGPL;
panettiere+Prof		MFSGPL;
droghiere+Prof		MFSGPL;
cuoco+Prof			MFSGPL;
giardiniere+Prof		MFSGPL;
cassiere+Prof		MFSGPL;
libraio+Prof		MFSGPL;
archivista+Prof		MFSGPL;
meccanico+Prof		MFSGPL;
servitore+Prof		MFSGPL;
domestica+Prof		MFSGPL;
camionista+Prof		MFSGPL;
taxista+Prof		MFSGPL;	
insegnante+Prof		MFSGPL;
istitutrice+Prof		MFSGPL;
professore+Prof		MFSGPL;
vice-rettore+Prof		MFSGPL;
vice-preside+Prof		MFSGPL;
bidello+Prof		MFSGPL;
albergatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
barista+Prof		MFSGPL;
carrettiere+Prof		MFSGPL;
bodyguard+Prof		MFSGPL;
intagliatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
motociclista+Prof		MFSGPL;
pescatore+Prof		MFSGPL;
postino+Prof		MFSGPL;
tabaccaio+Prof		MFSGPL;
Professore% Ordinario+Prof		MFSGPL; 	! Full professor
Professore% Associato+Prof		MFSGPL;		! (Associate Professor)
Assistente+Prof			MFSGPL;
Professore% Onorario+Prof		MFSGPL;
Professore% incaricato+Prof	MFSGPL;
Dottorando% di% Ricerca+Prof	MFSGPL;
Prorettore+Prof				MFSGPL; ! (Vice-Rector)
Presidente% di% Consiglio% di% Corso% di% Laurea+Prof	MFSGPL; ! (Head of a Bachelor/Msc curriculum on a given topic)
